California, session 20252026, SB666.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17053.3 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17053.3. (a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2031, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, an amount equal to 100 percent of the amount paid or incurred during the taxable year for the purchase and installation of a security surveillance system at the taxpayer’s qualified residence. The credit shall not exceed two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) per taxable year.(b) For purposes of this section, the following shall apply: (1) “Principal residence” has the same meaning as that term is used in Section 121 of the Internal Revenue Code. (2) “Qualified residence” means a single-family residence dwelling or housing unit located in the state that is the taxpayer’s principal residence. (3) “Security surveillance system” means any video, audio, or photographic recording devices devices, or corresponding security software, installed for the purpose of surveilling or recording activity occurring at the qualified residence.(c) Each qualified residence shall only be eligible for one credit allowed by this section per taxable year. In the case of two taxpayers filing a joint return, only one credit may be claimed per qualified residence. If a taxpayer has filed a separate return for a taxable year for which a joint return could have been filed, only one of the taxpayers may claim the credit allowed by this section.(d) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding eight years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.(e) (1) For purposes of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares the specific goal, purpose, and objective of the tax credit allowed by this section is to assist California residents in affording the cost of a home security camera, which is costly to purchase and install. Home security cameras help deter property crime, allow residents to monitor their homes for natural disasters, and improve residents’ overall sense of security.(2) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining whether the credit achieves the stated objective shall be the number of California taxpayers that receive the credit pursuant to this section.(3) No later than June 30, 2028, and each June 30 thereafter, the Franchise Tax Board shall submit a report to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing the number of taxpayers that claimed the tax credit pursuant to this section for the most recent taxable year.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed. However, any unused credit may continue to be carried forward, as provided in subdivision (a), until the credit is exhausted.SEC. 2. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.